Illinois, session 104th, HB1589.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Local Library Act is amended by 5changing Section 4-3.3 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 5/4-3.3)  (from Ch. 81, par. 4-3.3)7    Sec. 4-3.3. Nominations. Nominations for the position of 8library trustee including the first board of library trustees 9shall be by petition, signed by at least 25 legal voters 10residing in the incorporated town or village (except a village 11under the commission form of government) or township and filed 12with the clerk of such incorporated town, village, or township 13within the time prescribed by the general election law. Such 14clerk shall certify the candidates for library trustees to the 15proper election authorities who shall conduct the election in 16accordance with the general election law. All candidates must 17be residents of the incorporated town, village, or township 18involved and have a valid library card for the library. The 19ballots shall not designate any political party, platform, or 20political principle.21(Source: P.A. 95-65, eff. 1-1-08.)